Utah statutes.
72-12-107.   Benefits of ride-sharing driver not taxable income.
Money and other benefits, other than salary, received by a driver in a ride-
sharing arrangement does not constitute income for the purpose of computing
gross income under Title 59, Chapter 10, Individual Income Tax.
